Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 2. Downtown Development Authority
§ 15-9-216.
Rights and powers of bondholders.

Subject to any contractual limitations binding upon the holders of any issue of bonds or trustee therefor, including but not limited to the restriction of the exercise of any remedy to a specified proportion or percentage of the holders, any holder of bonds or trustee therefor has the right and power, for the equal benefit and protection of all holders of bonds similarly situated:

By an action in the nature of mandamus or other suit, action or proceeding at law or in equity to enforce his rights against the municipality and to require and compel the governing body to perform its duties and obligations under this article and its covenants and agreements with the bondholders;

By action or suit in equity to require the governing body to account as if they were the trustees of an express trust;

By action or suit in equity to enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful or in violation of the rights of the bondholders;

To bring suit upon the bonds.

No right or remedy conferred by this article upon any holder of bonds or any trustee therefor is intended to be exclusive of any other right or remedy, but each such right or remedy is cumulative and in addition to every other right or remedy and may be exercised without exhausting and without regard to any other remedy conferred by this article or by any other law.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 150, § 1.

§ 15-9-217.
Officers and other personnel employed by board; duties; administrative expenses.

The board shall employ and fix the compensation, subject to the approval of the governing body, of the following, who shall serve at the pleasure of the board:

A director, who shall be a person of good moral character and possessed of a reputation for integrity, responsibility and business ability. No member of the board is eligible to hold the position of director. Before entering upon the duties of his office, the director shall take and subscribe to the oath of office and furnish a bond as required by the board. The director is the chief executive officer of the authority. Subject to the approval of the board and directed by it when necessary, he shall have general supervision over and be responsible for the preparation of plans and the performance of the functions of the authority in the manner authorized by this article. He shall attend all meetings of the board and shall render to the board and to the governing body a regular report covering the activities and financial condition of the authority. In the absence or disability of the director, the board may designate a qualified person to perform the duties of the office as acting director. The director shall furnish the board with such information or reports governing the operation of the authority as the board may from time to time require;

A treasurer, who shall keep the financial records of the authority and who, together with the director, shall approve all vouchers for the expenditure of funds of the authority. He shall perform such other duties as may be delegated to him by the board;

A secretary, who shall maintain custody of the official seal, if any, and of all records, books, documents or other papers not required to be maintained by the treasurer. He shall attend all meetings of the board and keep a record of all its proceedings. He shall perform such other duties as may be delegated to him by the board;

Upon recommendation of the director, such clerical, technical and professional assistants, including but not limited to persons in the fields of engineering, planning and economic research, as shall, in the opinion of the board, be necessary to provide for the efficient performance of the functions of the board.

Upon approval of the governing body of the municipality and a majority of the persons voting in the election, called for the purpose of this subsection, owning real property within the downtown development authority excluding real property used exclusively for residential purposes, under election procedures specified by the governing body, an annual special assessment not to exceed thirty (30) mills against the assessed value of real property within the downtown development authority, excluding real property used exclusively for residential purposes, may be levied. The authorization for the assessment expires in four (4) years unless reauthorized by the governing body and persons owning real property within the district. The assessment shall be levied and collected in the same manner as the general property tax levy for the municipality. Proceeds of the assessment may be expended by the authority for:

Administrative costs;

Landscaping or maintenance of public areas;

Planning or management of development or improvement activities;

Promotion of public events; and

Activities in support of business recruitment and development.

All proceeds of the assessment shall be used by the authority for district activities and improvements.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 150, § 1; 1987, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 15-9-218.
Authority to adopt budget; sources of finance.

The authority shall adopt a budget for each fiscal year, shall maintain accounts, and shall cause an annual audit, or other oversight in accordance with rules applicable to special districts under W.S. 9-1-507(a)(iii), to be made pertaining to the fiscal affairs of the authority. Administrative review of the proposed budget shall be in accordance with the policies of each municipality, prior to submission of the proposed budget to the governing body for approval.

The operations of the authority shall be principally financed from the following sources and such other sources as may be approved by the governing body:

Donations to the authority;

Monies borrowed and to be repaid from other funds received under the authority of this article.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 150, § 1; 1994, ch. 29, § 1.

§ 15-9-219.
Assessments against funds of authority.

The governing body shall have the power to assess against the funds of the authority for the use and benefit of the general fund of the municipality a reasonable pro rata share of such funds for the cost of handling and auditing, which assessment when made shall be paid annually by the board pursuant to an appropriate item in its budget.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 150, § 1.

§ 15-9-220.
Conflict of interest.

No board member or employee of the board shall vote or otherwise participate in any matter in which he has a specific financial interest, defined as a matter in which the member or employee would receive a benefit or incur a cost substantially greater than other property owners within the district. When such interest appears, the board member or employee shall make such interest known, and shall thenceforth refrain from voting on or otherwise participating in the particular transaction involving such interest. Willful violation of the provisions of this section constitutes grounds for dismissal subject to the provisions of W.S. 15-9-206(d).

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 150, § 1.

§ 15-9-221.
Provisions to be construed liberally.

All powers conferred upon municipalities by this article are cumulative and in addition to those conferred by any other general or special law or municipal charter or ordinance and shall be liberally construed to effectuate the purposes of this article. This article is an alternative method of accomplishing its purposes independent of and in addition to any other powers conferred upon municipalities electing to exercise the authority granted by this article.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 150, § 1.

§ 15-9-222.
Property in development area subject to taxes for municipality's general obligation debts.

Subject to W.S.

15-9-207

, all real and personal property located within the development area shall continue to be subject to ad valorem taxes levied by the municipality to pay the principal and interest on all existing general obligation debts of the municipality and any future debts which may be authorized by law.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 150, § 1.

§ 15-9-223.
Inclusion of additional property into development area; procedure.

Subsequent to the organization of an authority, additional property may be included in the development area. Proceedings for inclusion shall be initiated by petition to the board of the authority signed by the owner or owners in fee of each parcel of land adjacent to the existing area sought to be included. The petition shall include evidence satisfactory to the board concerning title to the property and an accurate legal description thereof. If the board approves the application, it shall submit the application to the governing body of the municipality. If the governing body also approves the application, it shall then, at a regular or special meeting, by amendment to the ordinance treating the authority, redescribe the development area so as to include the additional property as described in the petition. From the effective date of the amendment the additional property shall be included within the development area and shall be subject to any taxes thereafter imposed by the municipality for the use and benefit of the authority.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 150, § 1.